Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3350 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. To promote and provide programming related to civic


education, engagement, and discourse, the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education shall select three institutions of higher education


within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education to establish a


Center for Civic Engagement. The State Regents shall select:


1. A comprehensive institution of higher education;

Req. No. 3044 Page 1


2. A regional institution of higher education; and


3. A two-year institution of higher education.


B. The purpose of each Center for Civic Engagement established


pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be to:


1. Enhance education in the fields of politics, economics,


philosophy, American history and government, and other related


fields as appropriate, with a focus on the rights and


responsibilities of American citizenship, fundamental democratic


principles, and the ways in which those principles are expressed in


federal, state, and local institutions;


2. Provide viewpoints and ideologically diverse resources to


students, faculty, state government agencies, educators, and the


general public regarding civic affairs;


3. Foster civic engagement through full and fair discussions


that promote civil dialogue among those holding conflicting points


of view; and


4. Assist in ensuring that institutions of higher education in


this state serve as robust marketplaces of ideas for all students


and faculty.


C. At the discretion of the governing board of each institution


of higher education chosen pursuant to subsection A of this section,


a Center for Civic Engagement created pursuant to this section may:


1. Establish an advisory board comprised of faculty and


students to guide the activities of the center;

Req. No. 3044 Page 2


2. Provide and facilitate internships and other relevant


experiences for students and the general public;


3. Hold events including, but not limited to, guest speakers


and nonpartisan public forums; and


4. Offer supplemental instruction to students in political


science, economics, philosophy, American history and government, and


any other field of study as appropriate.


D. By July 1, 2029, the State Regents shall electronically


submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the


Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report


shall include:


1. The number of students, faculty, and members of the general


public who engaged with each Center for Civic Engagement since its


establishment;


2. The types of activities held by each Center for Civic


Engagement; and


3. Recommendations for improvement and expansion of Centers for


Civic Engagement.


E. The State Regents may promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 3044 Page 3


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3044 EB 1/15/2026 8:34:35 AM









































Req. No. 3044 Page 4